Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-816
Judicial officeholder; retention election; how conducted.

Said election shall be conducted in the manner and form provided for elections generally with respect to the nonpolitical ballot and the results of said election shall be certified in like manner.

Laws 1963, c. 125, § 4, p. 478.